Oklahoma, session 2025, SB324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5091 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. “Qualified research expenditures” means the amount of
qualified research expenses claimed on line 9 or line 28 of federal
Form 6765 (Rev. December 2023) or the relevant line number of
federal Form 6765 in effect for the applicable tax year for expenses
incurred in this state.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the

“Oklahoma Research and Development Rebate Fund”. The fund shall be
a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies appropriated to the Department that are
designated for deposit in the fund. Monies appropriated to this
fund shall be expended to reimburse qualifying establishments for
qualified research expenditures.
C. There is hereby created a research and development rebate
program for the cost of qualified research expenditures by
establishments.
D. The investment rebate program shall be administered by the
Oklahoma Department of Commerce.
E. To be eligible for consideration for a research and
development rebate payment awarded under the provisions of this act,
the establishment shall:
1. Submit an application and documentation to the Department,
as required by the Department;
2. Provide documentation as required by the Department to
determine that the research and development expenditures occurred
within this state; and
3. Have filed all Oklahoma tax returns as required by law.
F. Claims for rebate approved by the Department shall be equal
to five percent (5%) of qualified research expenditures of the
establishment.
G. Claims for rebate approved by the Department shall be paid
in the order that they are received. Total claims approved for
rebate shall not exceed the balance of the Oklahoma Research and
Development Rebate Fund. In no event shall claims approved for
rebate exceed Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) in any fiscal
year.
H. If the amount of a claim exceeds the amount available in the
Oklahoma Research and Development Rebate Fund or the fiscal year
limitation provided in subsection G of this section, the payment may
be made in a prorated amount. Claims for rebate not approved by the
ENR. S. B. NO. 324 Page 2

Department due to the limitations provided in subsection G of this
section may be approved and paid in subsequent fiscal years.
I. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce may promulgate rules to
effectuate the provisions of this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 324 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 324 Page 4